Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 8 UNLAWFUL ACTS
44-30-833. Financial interest restrictions.

A manufacturer or distributor of slot machines, associated equipment, or related equipment shall not knowingly, without notifying the division within ten days:

Have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any operator;

Allow any of its officers, or any other person with a substantial interest in the business, to have any interest in an operator;

Employ any person in any capacity or allow any person to represent the business in any way if the person is also employed by an operator;

Allow any operator or any person having a substantial interest therein, to have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the business.

The word "interest" as used in this section does not preclude transactions in the ordinary course of business.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-835 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-834. Revocation or expiration of license - requirement of notification.

A licensee whose license has been revoked or has expired shall notify the licensee's employer within twenty-four hours after the revocation or expiration.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-837 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-835. Personal pecuniary gain or conflict of interest.

It is unlawful for any person to issue, suspend, revoke, or renew any license pursuant to this article 30 for any personal pecuniary gain or any thing of value, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(r), or for any person to violate any of the provisions of section 44-30-401.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section commits a class 3 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-838 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-836. False or misleading information - unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to provide any false or misleading information under the provisions of this article 30.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-839 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-837. Conducting gaming activities without a license.

A person shall not offer sports betting or one or more games, authorized as "limited gaming", to the public without possessing the required license from the commission to conduct:

Sports betting operations;

Internet sports betting operations; or

Operations using equipment or devices that qualify as slot machines or are used to play roulette or craps.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2878, § 15, effective August 10.